Utah statutes.
23-19-6.   Imitating or counterfeiting license unlawful -- Violation -- Penalty.

It is unlawful to imitate or counterfeit any license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration for the purpose of defrauding the state of Utah or for evading the purposes and provisions of this code. Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 90, 1979 General Session

